District of Columbia statutes.
21-119

Allowances made before bond given.

An allowance made to a guardian for the clothing, support, maintenance, education or other expenses incurred for the ward or his estate, before the guardian gives bond or is appointed, has the same effect in law as if made subsequently to the appointment of the guardian and his giving bond.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 741, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-119.
1973 Ed., § 21-119.